Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-205
Consolidation of various finance and development entities; legislative findings.

The Legislature further finds that the use of a single staff by the Nebraska Mortgage Finance Fund, the Nebraska Development Finance Fund, and the Agricultural Development Corporation has proven to be very efficient and that it would promote an even more efficient operation of the activities of such entities if they were consolidated into a single entity with a single governing body.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 5.